en: Shipping Labels
xx: Shipping Labels
cs: Přepravní štítky
da: Forsendelsesetiketter
de: Versandaufkleber & -etiketten
es: Etiquetas adhesivas de envío
fr: Étiquettes d'expédition
it: Etichette per spedizioni
ja: 出荷ラベル
nl: Verzendlabels
no: Fraktetiketter
pl: Etykiety wysyłkowe
pt: Rótulos de remessa
ru: Транспортные этикетки
sv: Fraktetiketter
tr: Gönderi Fişleri

en: Shipping Tags
xx: Shipping Tags
cs: Přepravní značky
da: Forsendelsesmærker
de: Versandanhänger
es: Etiquetas de envío
fr: Vignettes d'expédition
it: Schede per spedizioni
ja: 出荷タグ
nl: Verzendetiketten
no: Fraktmerker
pl: Zawieszki towarowe
pt: Etiquetas de remessa
ru: Транспортные бирки
sv: Fraktmärken
tr: Gönderi Etiketleri

en: Laminating Film\, Pouches & Sheets
xx: Laminating Film\, Pouches & Sheets
cs: Laminovací fólie a kapsy
da: Lamineringsfilm\, lommer og ark
de: Laminierfolie & Schutzhüllen
es: Fundas\, bolsas y películas para laminado
fr: Films et pochettes à plastifier
it: Buste e pellicole per laminatura
ja: ラミネートフィルム
nl: Lamineerfolie en -hoezen
no: Film\, poser og ark for laminering
pl: Folie i koszulki do laminowania
pt: Filme e envelopes laminados
ru: Плёнка\, пакеты и файлы для ламинирования
sv: Lamineringsfilm\, -påsar och -omslag
tr: Kaplayıcı Film\, Kese ve Kılıflar

en: Mounting Putty
xx: Mounting Putty
cs: Lepicí hmota
da: Hæftemasse
de: Klebepads
es: Masilla adhesiva
fr: Mastic de fixation
it: Mastice per fissaggio
ja: 粘着タブ
nl: Plakgum
no: Heftemasse
pl: Taśmy dwustronne klejące
pt: Massa adesiva
ru: Канцелярский пластилин
sv: Häftmassa
tr: Hamur Yapıştırıcı

en: Office Tape
xx: Office Tape
cs: Kancelářská páska
da: Kontortape
de: Büroklebeband
es: Cinta adhesiva de oficina
fr: Ruban adhésif
it: Nastro adesivo
ja: セロハンテープ
nl: Plakband voor op kantoor
no: Kontorteip
pl: Taśmy samoprzylepne
pt: Fita para escritório
ru: Клейкие ленты для офиса
sv: Kontorstejp
tr: Selobant

en: Paper Clips & Clamps
xx: Paper Clips & Clamps
cs: Kancelářské sponky a svorky
da: Papirclips og -klemmer
de: Büroklammern & Papierklammern
es: Clips y clips cruzados
fr: Trombones et pinces
it: Graffette e fermacarte
ja: クリップ
nl: Paperclips en klemmen
no: Binders og papirklemmer
pl: Klipsy i spinacze do papieru
pt: Clipes e presilhas para papel
ru: Зажимы и скрепки
sv: Gem och pappersklämmor
tr: Ataşlar ve Kıskaçlar

en: Binder Clips
xx: Binder Clips
cs: Sponky na dokumenty
da: Papirklemmer
de: Büroklammern
es: Pinzas para papel
fr: Pinces doubles
it: Clip fermacarte
ja: バインダークリップ
nl: Papierklemmen
no: Papirklemmer
pl: Klipsy biurowe
pt: Prendedores de papel
ru: Канцелярские зажимы для бумаг
sv: Pärmklämmor
tr: Kıskaçlar

en: Paper Clips
xx: Paper Clips
cs: Kancelářské sponky
da: Papirclips
de: Papierklammern
es: Clips
fr: Attaches
it: Graffette fermacarte
ja: ペーパークリップ
nl: Paperclips
no: Binders
pl: Spinacze
pt: Clipes de papel
ru: Скрепки
sv: Gem
tr: Ataşlar

en: Paper Products
xx: Paper Products
cs: Papírové výrobky
da: Papirvarer
de: Papierprodukte
es: Productos de papel
fr: Papeterie
it: Prodotti di carta
ja: 紙製品
nl: Papierproducten
no: Papirprodukter
pl: Artykuły papiernicze
pt: Produtos de papel
ru: Бумажные изделия
sv: Pappersprodukter
tr: Kağıt Ürünleri

en: Binder Paper
xx: Binder Paper
cs: Kroužkový papír
da: Papir til ringbind
de: Papier für Hefter
es: Papel perforado
fr: Feuilles de classeur
it: Fogli da raccoglitore
ja: ルーズリーフ
nl: Ringbandpapier
no: Hullark
pl: Kołonotatniki
pt: Papel para encadernação
ru: Переплетная бумага
sv: Pärmpapper
tr: Çizgili Kağıt

en: Blank ID Cards
xx: Blank ID Cards
cs: Prázdné identifikační karty
da: Tomme id-kort
de: Blanko-Ausweise
es: Tarjetas de identificación en blanco
fr: Cartes d'identité vierges
it: Schede ID vuote
ja: IDカード
nl: Lege id-kaarten
no: Tomme ID-kort
pl: Puste identyfikatory
pt: Crachás em branco
ru: Чистые идентификационные карты
sv: Blanka ID-kort
tr: Boş Kimlik Kartları

en: Business Cards
xx: Business Cards
cs: Vizitky
da: Visitkort
de: Visitenkarten
es: Tarjetas de visita
fr: Cartes de visite
it: Biglietti da visita
ja: 名刺
nl: Visitekaartjes
no: Visittkort
pl: Wizytówki
pt: Cartões de visita
ru: Визитные карточки
sv: Visitkort
tr: Kartvizitler

en: Business Forms & Receipts
xx: Business Forms & Receipts
cs: Obchodní formuláře a stvrzenky
da: Virksomhedsformularer og kvitteringer
de: Geschäftsformulare & -belege
es: Formularios comerciales y recibos
fr: Formulaires et bordereaux
it: Moduli e ricevute aziendali
ja: 事務用帳票類・領収書
nl: Bedrijfsformulieren en ontvangstbewijzen
no: Forretningsskjemaer og -kvitteringer
pl: Formularze i rachunki
pt: Formulários e recibos de negócios
ru: Бланки и квитанции
sv: Företagsformulär och kvitton
tr: Matbu Evraklar ve Makbuzlar

en: Checks
xx: Checks
cs: Šeky
da: Checkhæfter
de: Scheckformulare
es: Cheques
fr: Chèques
it: Assegni
ja: 小切手帳
nl: Cheques
no: Sjekker
pl: Czeki
pt: Cheques
ru: Чеки
sv: Checkar
tr: Çekler

en: Cover Paper
xx: Cover Paper
cs: Papír na desky
da: Omslagspapir
de: Feinkarton
es: Papel para portada
fr: Feuilles de couverture
it: Carta per copertine
ja: 表紙用紙
nl: Voorbladen
no: Omslagspapir
pl: Papier pakunkowy
pt: Papel para capas
ru: Обложечная бумага
sv: Omslagspapper
tr: Kapak Sayfası

en: Envelopes
xx: Envelopes
cs: Obálky
da: Konvolutter
de: Briefumschläge
es: Sobres
fr: Enveloppes
it: Buste
ja: 封筒
nl: Enveloppen
no: Konvolutter
pl: Koperty
pt: Envelopes
ru: Конверты
sv: Kuvert
tr: Zarflar

en: Index Cards
xx: Index Cards
cs: Kartotéční lístky
da: Kartotekskort
de: Karteikarten
es: Tarjetas de índice
fr: Fiches
it: Archiviatori
ja: 索引カード
nl: Indexkaarten
no: Indekskort
pl: Karty katalogowe
pt: Cartões para indexadores
ru: Картотечные карточки
sv: Kartotekkort
tr: Dizin Kartları

en: Notebooks & Notepads
xx: Notebooks & Notepads
cs: Záznamníky a poznámkové bloky
da: Notesbøger og notesblokke
de: Notizbücher & Notizblöcke
es: Libretas y blocs de notas
fr: Carnets et bloc-notes
it: Taccuini e block-notes
ja: ノート・メモ帳
nl: Notitie- en kladblokken
no: Notatbøker og notatblokker
pl: Bruliony i notesy
pt: Cadernos e blocos
ru: Блокноты
sv: Anteckningsböcker och anteckningsblock
tr: Not Defterleri

en: notebooks
de: Hefte
es: cuadernos
fr: cahiers

en: Paper pads
de: Notizblöcke
es: Blocs de notas
fr: Blocs-notes